Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7009
Contracts; duties.

Whenever a health carrier contracts to have another entity perform the credentialing functions required by the Health Care Professional Credentialing Verification Act or applicable rules and regulations, the director shall hold the health carrier responsible for monitoring the activities of the entity with which it contracts and for ensuring that the requirements of the act and applicable rules and regulations are met.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 34.